Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB203.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186.230 is amended to read as follows:
The county clerk shall see that KRS 186.005 to 186.260 in his or her county are
enforced. In so doing, the clerk[he] shall:
(1) Take all applications as provided in KRS 186.005 to 186.260;
(2) Issue the receipts on blanks furnished by the cabinet;
(3) Collect the fees due the state;
(4) Distribute the registration plates furnished by the Transportation Cabinet and
Department of Vehicle Regulation and keep a complete public record of all
registrations for the[his] county, in the clerk's[his] office;
(5) Report and remit each Monday to the Transportation Cabinet all moneys collected
during the previous week, together with a duplicate of all receipts issued by the
clerk's office[him] during the same period. The clerk[He] shall make all checks
payable to the State Treasurer. Unless the clerk forwards duplicates of all receipts
issued by the clerk's office[him] during the reporting period with the[his] report
and remits the amount shown due by the report within seven (7) days after the
report and remittance are due, the clerk[he] shall pay a penalty of one percent (1%)
per month or fraction thereof on the amount of money shown to be due on the
report. The cabinet may, in its discretion, grant a county clerk a reasonable
extension of time to file the[his] report and remit all moneys, not to exceed ten (10)
days for any one (1) report. The extension, however, must be requested prior to the
end of the seven (7) day period and shall begin to run at the end of that[said]
period. All penalties collected under this provision shall be paid into the State
Treasury as a part of the revenue collected under KRS 186.005 to 186.260;
(6) The clerk shall mail to the Transportation Cabinet one (1) duplicate of all receipts
issued by the clerk's office[him] within two (2) weeks of the date of issuance. The
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/14/2025 1:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1873
Transportation Cabinet shall make the receipts pertaining to commercial vehicles
available to the Department of Vehicle Regulation for use in assimilating data[
therefrom];
(7) Account to the Transportation Cabinet for all registration plates and receipt forms
consigned to the clerk's office[him], at such time or times as the Transportation
Cabinet may direct, and give the appropriate cabinet timely notice of a probable
deficiency of plates or other supplies;
(8) Any county clerk, who in collecting the taxes and fees due the state or county clerk,
accepts in payment thereof a check which is not honored upon presentment, shall
have a lien on the vehicle for the amount of such check. This lien shall be
subordinate to any prior perfected lien, either contractual or statutory;
(9) A[No] person shall not be permitted to sell, trade, or transfer ownership of a motor
vehicle if evidence is presented to the county clerk that any lien exists on the motor
vehicle; and
(10) The county clerk shall not issue to any manufacturer or dealer any registration plate
other than a manufacturer's or dealer's plate, or registration plate which is under a
dealer assignment pursuant to KRS 186A.230, except when the dealer registers a
motor vehicle under a U-Drive-It permit, without collecting designated registration
fees and applicable taxes.
Section 2. KRS 186.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If any motor vehicle other than a commercial vehicle upon which the license tax has
been paid is destroyed by fire or accident, so that the vehicle is rendered entirely
useless the owner shall be entitled to have refunded to him or her a part of the
license fee paid in proportion[by him proportionate] to the registration period for
which the license was granted.
(2) If any commercial vehicle upon which the license tax has been paid is destroyed by
fire or accident so that the vehicle is rendered entirely useless the owner is entitled
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/14/2025 1:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1873
to have refunded to him that portion of the tax which he or she had
previously[theretofore] paid allocable to the remaining complete quarters of the
unexpired period for which the tax was paid.
(3) To obtain the refund, the owner whose motor vehicle has been destroyed shall apply
to the Transportation Cabinet, submitting an[his] affidavit and the affidavits of two
(2) reputable persons, attesting to the fact that the vehicle has been destroyed, and
the manner of destruction, and shall return the original license plates to the
Transportation Cabinet. The Transportation Cabinet shall examine all applications
and investigate the claims for refund, and if a claim is found to be correct, it shall
approve it for payment, whereupon the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall
draw a warrant upon the State Treasurer in favor of the owner of the destroyed
vehicle, and charge the amount of it to the[ state] road fund.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/14/2025 1:57 PM Jacketed